District of Columbia statutes.
24-805

Reservation of authority.

The right to alter, amend, or repeal this chapter is expressly reserved.

History

Dec. 9, 1970, 84 Stat. 1403, Pub. L. 91-538, § 7

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-705.
1973 Ed., § 24-705.